Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Boating Accidents

§ 59-21-51.
Duty to report boating accidents; “boating accident” defined.

In the case of a boating accident involving collision, accident or other casualty involving a motorboat or vessel subject to this chapter, while operated upon the waters of this state, the operator thereof, if the collision, accident or other casualty results in death to any person, injury causing any person to remain incapacitated for a period in excess of twenty-four (24) hours, or damage to property in excess of one hundred dollars ($100.00), shall file, on forms provided, with the commission an accident report with a full description of the collision, accident or other casualty, including such other information as is required under the provisions of this chapter. The commission shall furnish copies of reports to the appropriate federal agencies and sheriff of the county in which such accident or other casualty takes place.

For the purpose of this chapter, a “boating accident” means a collision, accident or other casualty involving (1) an undocumented motorboat or (2) any other undocumented vessel used for pleasure or recreational purposes. A vessel subject to this chapter is considered to be involved in a “boating accident” whenever the occurrence results in damage by or to the vessel or its equipment; in injury or loss of life to any person, or in the disappearance of any person from on board under circumstances which indicate the possibility of death or injury. A “boating accident” includes, but is not limited to, capsizing, collision, foundering, flooding, fire, explosion and the disappearance of a vessel other than by theft. A report is required whenever a vessel subject to this chapter is involved in a “boating accident” which results in any one or more of the following:

Loss of life.

Injury causing any person to remain incapacitated for a period in excess of twenty-four (24) hours.

Actual physical damage to property (including vessels) in excess of one hundred dollars ($100.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-16; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 16; Laws, 1973, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1973.

§ 59-21-53.
Time for submission of accident reports; contents; distribution; disclosure.

Whenever death results from a boating accident, a written report shall be submitted within forty-eight (48) hours. For every other reportable boating accident a written report shall be submitted within five (5) days after such accident. The operator(s) of the boat(s) shall prepare and submit the written report(s) to the commission. Every written report shall contain the following information:

The numbers and/or names of vessels involved.

The locality where the accident occurred.

The time and date when the accident occurred.

Weather and sea conditions at time of accident.

The name, address, age, and boat operating experience of the operator of the reporting vessel.

The names and addresses of operators of other vessels involved.

The names and addresses of the owners of vessels or property involved.

The names and addresses of any person or persons injured or killed.

The nature and extent of injury to any person or persons.

A description of damage to property (including vessels) and estimated cost of repairs.

A description of the accident (including opinions as to the causes).

The length, propulsion, horsepower, fuel and construction of the reporting vessel.

Names and addresses of known witnesses.

The commission shall ensure that the forms required by this section are stocked at various county offices, boat companies, fishing camps, marinas, law enforcement offices, and at such other places as to make them reasonably available at all times.

The commission shall consolidate such reports and transmit the same to the appropriate agencies. Boating accident reports shall not be a public record nor made available for public distribution, except as otherwise provided by law.

The commission may, upon written request of any person involved in a boating accident or upon written request of the representative of his or her estate, his or her surviving spouse, or one or more of his or her surviving next of kin, disclose to such requester or his or her legal counsel or a representative of his insurer any information contained in such report except the parties’ version of the accident as set out in the written report filed by such parties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-17; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 17; Laws, 1973, ch. 372, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 378, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 59-21-55.
Duty of vessel operator to remain at scene of accident and render aid and assistance; liability for rendering assistance.

It shall be the duty of the operator of any vessel involved in a boating accident to remain at the scene of such accident until he has rendered all necessary aid and assistance, including the carrying or the making of arrangements for the carrying of any person involved in such accident to a physician, surgeon, or hospital for medical, surgical or hospital treatment, if necessary, or if such carrying is requested by such injured person, and it is the further duty of the operator of any vessel or vessels involved in a boating accident required to be reported under this chapter to report the same as herein provided.

Any person who complies with subsection (1) of this section or who gratuitously and in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable care renders assistance at the scene of a vessel collision, accident, or other casualty without objection of any person assisted, shall not be held liable for any civil damages as a result of the rendering of assistance or for any act committed in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable care or omission in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable care by such person in providing or arranging salvage, towage, medical treatment, or other assistance where the assisting person acts as an ordinary, reasonable, prudent man would have acted under the same or similar circumstances.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-18; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 18; Laws, 1973, ch. 372, § 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 376, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1979.